Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-313
Manufacturer, defined.

Manufacturer shall mean any person who assembles from raw materials or subparts a completed piece or pieces of pickle cards and pickle card units.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-140.15;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 79.